South Dakota, session 2026, SB220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Department of Corrections shall conduct a comprehensive study of juvenile
correctional and residential facilities outside of this state. The study must include an
evaluation of:
(1) Best practices in juvenile correctional and residential facilities;
(2) Therapeutic pod housing models that prioritize rehabilitation;
(3) Vocational training and mental health integration; and
(4) Staff-to-youth ratios and safety protocols in non-traditional settings.
The study must include on-site inspections and interviews at no fewer than three
juvenile correctional or residential facilities outside of this state.
Section 2. There is appropriated $50,000 from the general fund, to the Department of
Corrections, for the purposes described in section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. The Department of Corrections shall submit a written report to the Executive
Board of the Legislative Research Council of its findings and recommendations no later than
September 1, 2026.
Section 4. The secretary of the Department of Corrections shall approve vouchers and the
state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 6. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.